Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-565
Rules and regulations.

The officer may adopt and promulgate rules, regulations, guidelines, and procedures to carry out sections 86-563 and 86-564.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 335;

Laws 2008, LB823, § 16.